Washington statutes.
RCW 41.37.100

Disability retirement—Criminal conduct.

A member shall not receive a disability retirement benefit under RCW 41.37.230 if the disability is the result of criminal conduct by the member committed after July 1, 2006.

[ 2004 c 242 s 13.]